Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.36.070

Coercion.

(1) A person is guilty of coercion if by use of a threat he or she compels or induces a person to engage in conduct which the latter has a legal right to abstain from, or to abstain from conduct which he or she has a legal right to engage in.

(2) "Threat" as used in this section means:

(a) To communicate, directly or indirectly, the intent immediately to use force against any person who is present at the time; or

(b) Threats as defined in *RCW 9A.04.110(27) (a), (b), or (c).

(3) Coercion is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 361; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.36.070.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 9A.04.110 was amended by 2011 c 166 s 2, changing subsection (27) to subsection (28).